Hawaii statutes.
§231-57.5 Notification of address and
social security number of debtor parent. The department of accounting and
general services shall notify the child support enforcement agency of the
address and social security number of each debtor who has been subject to a
setoff because of a child support debt. [L 1986, c 332, §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next